hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Csónakázás és rafting > Evezős csónakok: Drift csónakok; Felfújható evezőscsónakok; Verseny-evezőscsónakok; Evezőscsónak-készletek; Univerzális evezőscsónakok
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Pływanie łodzią i rafting > Łodzie wiosłowe: Łodzie typu drift boat; Pontony wiosłowe; Wyścigowe łodzie wiosłowe; Zestawy do budowy łodzi wiosłowych; Robocze łodzie wiosłowe
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 划船/泛舟 > 划艇/划舟: 漂流船; 充氣划艇; 競速划艇; 划艇套組; 實用划艇
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Kayıkçılık ve Rafting > Kürekli Botlar: Akıntı tekneleri; Şişme kürekli tekneler; Kürek yarışı tekneleri; Kürekli tekne kitleri; Hizmet amaçlı kürekli tekneler
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Plovljenje čamcem i rafting > Čamci na vesla: Čamci za drift; Čamci na vesla na napuhavanje; Čamci na vesla za utrkivanje; Kompleti za čamce na vesla; Višenamjenski čamci na vesla
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 赛艇用品 > 小划船: 漂流艇; 充气划艇; 竞速划艇; 划艇套件; 多用途划艇
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Navegación y rafting > Botes de remo: Botes de deriva; Botes de remos inflables; Botes de remos de carreras; Kits de botes de remos; Botes de remos utilitarios
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 보트/래프트 > 로 보트: 드리프트 보트; 공기 주입식 노보트; 경주용 노보트; 노보트 키트; 다목적 노보트
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Плаване с лодка и рафтинг > Гребни лодки: Дрифт лодки; Надуваеми гребни лодки; Състезателни гребни лодки; Комплекти гребни лодки; Универсални гребни лодки
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Товары для гребли и рафтинга > Гребные лодки: Дрифт-боты; Надувные весельные лодки; Гоночные весельные лодки; Наборы для сборки весельных лодок; Хозяйственные весельные лодки
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Plaisance et rafting > Avirons: Drift boats; Barques gonflables; Bateaux d’aviron de course; Kits pour barques; Barques utilitaires
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Boating & Rafting > Row Boats: Drift Boats; Inflatable Row Boats; Racing Row Boats; Row Boat Kits; Utility Row Boats
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Plaukimas valtimis ir plaustais > Irklinės valtys: Dreifuojančios valtys; Pripučiamos irklinės valtys; Lenktyninės irklinės valtys; Irklinių valčių rinkinys; Irklinės valtys
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Bootssport > Ruderboote: Driftboote; Aufblasbare Ruderboote; Renn-Ruderboote; Ruderboot-Bausätze; Mehrzweck-Ruderboote
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > カヌー・ラフティング > ローボート: ドリフトボート; インフレータブルローボート; レーシングローボート; ローボートキット; ユーティリティローボート
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Chèo thuyển & thả bè > Thuyền chèo: Thuyền trôi sông; Thuyền chèo bơm hơi; Thuyền chèo đua; Bộ lắp ráp thuyền chèo; Thuyền chèo đa năng
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Varen en rafting > Roeiboten: Driftboten; Opblaasbare roeiboten; Wedstrijdroeiboten; Roeibootkits; Roeiboten voor algemeen gebruik
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > การล่องเรือและแพ > เรือพาย: เรือดริฟต์; เรือกรรเชียงเป่าลม; เรือกรรเชียงแข่ง; ชุดอุปกรณ์เรือกรรเชียง; เรือกรรเชียงอเนกประสงค์
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Plovba in rafting > Veslaški čolni: Drift čolni; Napihljivi čolni na vesla; Dirkalni čolni na vesla; Kompleti čolna na vesla; Delovni čolni na vesla
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Båtsport > Roddbåtar: Driftbåtar; Uppblåsbara roddbåtar; Tävlingsroddbåtar; Roddbåtskit; Bruksroddbåtar
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Kajaky, kánoe a rafty > Veslice a pramice: Driftovací lodě; Nafukovací veslice; Závodní veslice; Sady pro stavbu veslic; Užitkové veslice
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Plimbări cu barca și rafting > Bărci cu vâsle: Bărci de derivă; Bărci gonflabile cu vâsle; Bărci cu vâsle de competiție; Kituri pentru bărci cu vâsle; Bărci utilitare cu vâsle
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Veneily ja koskenlasku > Soutuveneet: Jokiveneet; Ilmatäytteiset soutuveneet; Kilpasoutuveneet; Soutuvenepakkaukset; Perussoutuveneet
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Båt og rafting > Robåter: Driftbåter; Oppblåsbare robåter; Konkurranserobåter; Robåtsett; Flerbruksrobåter
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Sejlads og rafting > Robåde: Driftboats; Oppustelige robåde; Kaproningsbåde; Sæt til robåde; Brugsrobåde
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Desportos náuticos e rafting > Barcos a remos: Barcos de deriva; Barcos a remos insufláveis; Barcos a remos de corrida; Kits de barcos a remos; Barcos a remos utilitários
it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Nautica e rafting > Barche da canottaggio: Drift boat; Barche a remi gonfiabili; Barche a remi da competizione; Kit per barche a remi; Barche a remi multiuso
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Ναυσιπλοΐα & ράφτινγκ > Βαρκάκια με κουπιά: Βάρκες drift; Φουσκωτές βάρκες; Αγωνιστικές βάρκες; Κιτ για βάρκες; Βάρκες γενικής χρήσης
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Navegação e rafting > Barcos a remo: Barcos de deriva; Barcos a remo infláveis; Barcos a remo de corrida; Kits de barco a remo; Barcos a remo utilitários
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Člnkovanie a rafting > Veslovacie člny: Čln na splavovanie prúdu; Nafukovacie veslice; Závodné veslice; Súprava pre veslice; Úžitkové veslice